Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB855.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6 of the act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act, is amended to read:Section 6. Duty of Contractor.--(a) Every contractor and subcontractor shall keep an accurate record showing the name, craft and the actual hourly rate of wage paid to each workman employed by him in connection with public work, and such record shall be preserved for two years from date of payment. The record shall be open at all reasonable hours to the inspection of the public body awarding the contract and to the secretary.123456789101112131415161718192021 (b) At the time the record is created, the contractor or subcontractor shall certify and file the record with the department in accordance with section 7.1.Section 2. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 6.1. Registration of Contractors and Subcontractors.--(a) A contractor or subcontractor may not bid on or perform any public work without first registering with the department as provided in this section.(b) Every contractor and subcontractor required to register under this section shall register in writing or electronically via a secure Internet connection, if permitted by the department, on a form provided by the department. The form submitted by the registrant shall include the following information:(1) For an individual registrant, all of the following: (i) Name. (ii) Date of birth. (iii) Home address and home telephone number. (iv) Driver's license number, a copy of an identification card issued by the state in which the individual resides or other form of identification as permitted by the department.(v) Business name, address and telephone number. (vi) Federal employer identification number, if applicable. (vii) Social Security number. (viii) All prior business names and addresses of all businesses in connection with public work operated by the individual.(2) For a general partnership registrant, all of the following:(i) Name of each partner. 20250SB0855PN0956 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Date of birth of each partner. (iii) Home address and home telephone number of each partner.(iv) Driver's license number or a copy of an identification card issued by the state in which the partner resides of each partner.(v) Partnership name, address and telephone number. (vi) Federal employer identification number, if applicable. (vii) Social Security number of each partner. (viii) All prior business names and addresses of all businesses in connection with public work operated by the registrant and each partner.(3) For a corporation, limited liability company or limited partnership, all of the following:(i) Name of each officer, manager and general partner. (ii) Date of birth of each officer, manager and general partner.(iii) Home address and home telephone number of each officer, manager and general partner.(iv) Driver's license number or a copy of an identification card issued by the state in which the individual resides, of each officer, manager and general partner.(v) Entity's name, address and telephone number. (vi) Federal employer identification number, if applicable. (vii) Social Security number of each officer, manager and general partner.(viii) Name of each director or each individual holding greater than a 5% equity interest in the entity.(ix) All prior business names and addresses of all businesses in connection with public work operated by each 20250SB0855PN0956 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 officer, manager and general partner.(4) For an out-of-State corporation, limited liability or limited partnership, the name and address of the entity's resident agent or registered office provider within this Commonwealth and any registration number or license number issued to the entity by its home state or political subdivision of the other state, if applicable.(5) For a joint venture registrant, the name, address and telephone number of the joint venture, as well as the name, address and telephone number of each party to the joint venture. If the parties to a joint venture include business entities, the information required from the entities under paragraph (2) shall also be provided.(6) A complete description of the nature of the business of the registrant to bid on or perform work on a project of public work.(7) A statement whether: (i) The registrant has ever been convicted of a criminal offense related to a business in connection with a public work transaction, fraud, theft, a crime of deception or a crime involving fraudulent business practices.(ii) The registrant has filed a petition in bankruptcy or, within the last ten years, received a final civil judgment entered against the registrant in which the registrant held an interest that was related to a business in connection with a public work transaction.(iii) The registrant's certificate or a similar certificate or license issued by any other state or political subdivision thereof has ever been revoked or suspended pursuant to an order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction and, if so, the 20250SB0855PN0956 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 current status of the certificate or similar certificate or license. The statement required by this clause shall include the same information with respect to any other business in which the person registering has or has ever had an interest.(8) Whether within the last ten years the registrant has been suspended or debarred from participating in any Federal, State, local or not-for-profit program through which public funding or other assistance is provided to owners for a public work performed by a business listed in the registration form.(9) Proof of liability insurance covering personal injury in an amount not less than $50,000 and insurance covering property damage caused by the work of a contractor or subcontractor connected with the public work in an amount not less than $50,000. For the purpose of this paragraph, proof of insurance may include information attested to by a registrant that the registrant is self-insured and the department shall develop forms for this purpose and make them available to registrants. The department may determine the sufficiency of the self-insurance and the manner in which it is maintained in compliance with this act.(10) Any other relevant and appropriate information as determined by the secretary.(c) Information requested under subsection (b)(1), (2), (3), (4) and (5) shall relate to a ten-year period prior to the time of registration. The registrant shall provide information prior to the last ten years, or as further clarification of the information provided, if the department requests the information.(d) At the time of registration and subsequently upon request, the registrant shall submit to the department 20250SB0855PN0956 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 documentation demonstrating that the contractor has worker's compensation insurance coverage for all workers as required by law.(e) A public works contractor and subcontractor shall be prohibited from registering if any of the following have occurred:(1) The contractor or subcontractor has been cited for failing to maintain all valid licenses, registrations or certificates required by a Federal, State or local government that may be required to do business or perform work at the location of the facility.(2) The contractor or subcontractor has been cited or convicted by a court or State agency for failure to comply with the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act, and, the act of December 5, 1936 (2nd Sp.Sess., 1937 P.L.2897, No.1), known as the Unemployment Compensation Law, and bonding and general liability insurance requirements specified in the contract for work.(3) Within the last three years, the contractor has been found by a final decision of a court or government agency to be in violation of any law or regulation applicable to its business, including tax, prompt payment, wage and hour, prevailing wage, environmental or safety laws or regulations, and has not been debarred or suspended on any project by a Federal, State or local government entity.(4) Within the last three years, the contractor or subcontractor has defaulted on a project or declared bankruptcy.(5) Within the last ten years, the contractor or subcontractor has been convicted of a crime relating to the contractor's or subcontractor's business.20250SB0855PN0956 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) The contractor or subcontractor failed to ensure that all individuals employed for the contractor or subcontractor have completed a minimum of the ten-hour safety training course established by the Occupational Safety and Health Administration of the United States Department of Labor.(7) The contractor or subcontractor failed to participate in an approved apprenticeship training program that is registered with and certified by the United States Department of Labor or the Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth that provides for on the job training, classroom training and graduation of apprentice trainees to the status of journeyperson similar to and under the training and graduation requirements as outlined under the registered apprentice training programs certified by the Department of Labor and Industry, for each specific trade or classification employed for work at the facility. Regardless of whether the program is subject to the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (Public Law 93-406, 29 U.S.C. § 1001 et seq.) ("ERISA") or a non-ERISA program.(f) A contractor or subcontractor registered to bid on or perform a public work in accordance with subsection (b) that is registered or licensed as a contractor or subcontractor in any other state, or political subdivision thereof, shall report the registration to the department on the initial registration and annual and biennial renewal registration form. Any disciplinary action taken in the other jurisdiction shall be reported to the department on the initial registration form or, if the action occurred subsequent to submission of an initial form, on the biennial registration form or within ninety days of final disposition, whichever is sooner. Multiple registrations or licensures shall be noted by the department on the contractor's 20250SB0855PN0956 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 registration, and the state, or political subdivision thereof, shall be notified by the department of any disciplinary action taken against the contractor or subcontractor in this Commonwealth.(g) A contractor or subcontractor required to register under this section shall update the information required to be included in the contractor's and subcontractor's form for registration, or renewal of registration, within thirty days after any change in the required information. There shall be no fee required for updating the information in an active registration.(h) A contractor and subcontractor required to register under this section may elect to renew the registration on an annual or biennial basis in a manner prescribed by the department. Registration shall be renewed not less than thirty days before the expiration date of the immediately preceding registration.(i) A contractor and subcontractor not performing public work on the effective date of this section shall file a registration form and submit a fee to the department before submitting a bid for a public work contract. A contractor or subcontractor may not be precluded from bidding for a public work contract or performing public work if the contractor or subcontractor has submitted a registration form to the department and includes a copy of the registration form with the bid. The department shall review the registration form and make a determination regarding registration within thirty days of receipt of the registration submission.(j) A contractor and subcontractor with a bid proposal submitted, or that is engaged in or performing public work on 20250SB0855PN0956 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the effective date of this section shall submit the registration form and fee to the department within thirty days of the effective date of this section.Section 6.2. Registration Fees.--(a) An initial registration form submitted by a registrant for a certificate shall be for a one year registration and accompanied by a fee of five hundred dollars ($500). After completion of the form and payment of the fee, the department shall review for a determination of approval and upon approval, issue the registrant a registration certificate identifying the name of the individual contractor or subcontractor, name and address of the business and a registration number. Renewal of registration for an annual registration shall be accompanied by a fee of five hundred dollars ($500). A registrant electing to renew registration for a two-year period shall accompany the renewal request with a fee of one thousand dollars ($1,000).(b) Registration fees collected under this section shall be deposited into the Public Work Contractor Compliance Account established in subsection (c) to be used exclusively for the purpose of enforcement of contractor and subcontractor public work registration under section 6.1 and building of the certified payroll public database under section 7.1.(c) The Public Work Contractor Compliance Account is established as a restricted account in the State Treasury. The department shall deposit all fees and penalties collected under section 6.1 after the effective date of this section into the Public Work Contractor Compliance Account. The source of funding for the restricted account includes:(1) Money received from the registration of a contractor or subcontractor required to register or renew registration under 20250SB0855PN0956 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section 6.1.(2) Fines, penalties, fees and costs assessed and collected as a result of enforcement activities conducted by the department's compliance personnel related to violations for failure to register or renew registration under section 6.1 and failure to submit certified payroll information required under section 6(b).(3) Money appropriated for the purposes of the enforcement of registration of contractors and subcontractors under section 6.1 and certified payroll database creation, maintenance or expansion under section 7.1.(4) Federal money appropriated or authorized for the purposes of the enforcement of registration of contractors and subcontractors under section 6.1 and certified payroll database creation, maintenance or expansion under section 7.1.(5) Gifts or other contributions from a public or private source for the restricted account.(6) Earnings on money in the restricted account.(d) The money in the account established in subsection (c) and any interest earned on the money may be drawn on by the Bureau of Labor Law Compliance for performing any activities necessary to carry out, administer and enforce the laws enforced by the bureau, provisions of section 6.1 and to create, maintain or upgrade the certified payroll public database under section 7.1.Section 6.3. Proof of Registration.--A contractor and subcontractor required to register under section 6.1 shall include its registration number in all public work advertisements distributed within this Commonwealth, contracts, estimates and proposals, and bids to public bodies on public 20250SB0855PN0956 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 work. This section shall apply to a public work advertisement, contract, estimate and proposal and bid created by a contractor or subcontractor after the effective date of this section.Section 7.1. Duties of Contractors, Subcontractors and the Department.--(a) A contractor and subcontractor required to register or renew registration under section 6.1 shall file a statement certifying payroll of all workmen paid on each project for public work. The filing shall be made in writing or electronically via a secure Internet connection, if permitted by the department, on a form provided by the department.(b) The department shall develop a standardized form for written and electronic submission of certified payroll.(c) The department's duties under this section are contingent on adequate funding provided by the General Assembly.(d) The department may: (1) Utilize existing resources available to compile database information.(2) C ontract with a third party to establish and operate the database.(e) The filing fee shall be five hundred dollars ($500) for the initial one year registration. Following the initial registration, registrants may choose to renew their registration for five hundred dollars ($500) for a one-year registration or may elect a two-year registration and pay a one thousand dollars ($1,000) filing fee.(f) The filing fees collected under this section shall be deposited into the Public Work Contractor Compliance Account established in section 6.2(c) to be used exclusively for the operations of the Bureau of Labor Law Compliance, the purpose of enforcement of contractor and subcontractor public work 20250SB0855PN0956 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 registration under section 6.1 and building of the certified payroll public database under this section.(g) The department may promulgate regulations to carry out this section.Section 3. Section 11 of the act is amended to read:Section 11. Remedies and Penalties.--(a) The fiscal or financial officer, or any public body having public work performed under which any workman shall have been paid less than the prevailing wage, shall forthwith notify the secretary, in writing, of the name of the person or firm failing to pay the prevailing wages.(b) Any workman may, within three months from the date of the occurrence of the incident complained of, file a protest, in writing, with the secretary objecting to the amount of wages paid for services performed by him on public work as being less than the prevailing wages for such services.(b.1) The fiscal or financial officer of any public body having public work that receives bids for public work to be performed and any workmen with wages required under this act who has knowledge of a contractor's or subcontractor's failure to register or renew registration under section 6.1 or failure to certify payroll under section 6(b), may, within three months from the date of the occurrence of the incident, file written notice with the secretary.(c) [Whenever a fiscal or financial officer of any public body shall notify the secretary that any person or firm required to pay its workmen the prevailing wage under this act has failed so to do, or whenever any workman employed upon public work shall have filed a timely protest objecting that he has been paid less than prevailing wages as required by this act, it] It 20250SB0855PN0956 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall be the duty of and the secretary shall forthwith investigate the matter and determine whether or not there has been a failure to pay the prevailing wages and whether such failure was intentional or otherwise[.], whenever:(1) a fiscal or financial officer of any public body shall notify the secretary that any person or firm required to pay its workmen the prevailing wage under this act has failed so to do or has failed to provide valid registration information with submission of bid or at any time during the performance of public work;(2) any workman employed upon public work shall have filed a timely protest objecting that the workman has been paid less than prevailing wages as required by this act or, if known to the workman, has attested to a failure of the contractor or subcontractor to register or maintain registration under section 6.1 or failure to certify payroll required under section 6(b); or(3) it becomes known to the Bureau of Labor Law compliance within the Department of Labor and Industry that a contractor or subcontractor performing public work fails to register or renew under section 6.1 or fails to certify its payroll to the department under section 6(b).(c.1) In any such investigation, the secretary shall provide for an appropriate hearing upon due notice to interested parties including the workmen, the employer and their respective representative, if any.(d) In the event that the secretary shall determine, after notice and hearing as required by this section, that any person or firm has failed to pay the prevailing wages, failed to register or renew registration as required under section 6.1 or 20250SB0855PN0956 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 failed to certify payroll as required under section 6(b) and that such failure was not intentional, [he] the secretary shall afford such person or firm a reasonable opportunity to adjust the matter by making payment or providing adequate security for the payment of the amounts required to be paid under this act as prevailing wages to the workmen affected on such terms and conditions as shall be approved by the secretary.(e) In the event that the secretary shall determine, after notice and hearing as required by this section, that any person or firm has failed to pay the prevailing wages, failed to register or renew registration as required under section 6.1 or failed to certify payroll as required under section 6(b) and that such failure was intentional, [he] the secretary shall thereupon notify all public bodies of the name or names of such persons or firms and no contract shall be awarded to such persons or firms or to any firm, corporation or partnership in which such persons or firms have an interest until three years have elapsed from the date of the notice to the public bodies aforesaid. The secretary may in addition thereto request the Attorney General to proceed to recover the penalties for the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania which are payable under subsection (f) of this section.(f) Whenever it shall be determined by the secretary, after notice and hearing as required by this section, that any person or firm has failed to pay the prevailing wages, failed to register or renew registration as required under section 6.1 or failed to certify payroll as required under section 6(b) and that such failure was intentional, such persons or firm shall be liable to the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania: [for liquidated damages, in addition to damages for any other breach of the 20250SB0855PN0956 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 contract in the amount of the underpayment of wages due any workman engaged in the performance of such contract.](1) for liquidated damages; and(2) damages for any other breach of the contract in the amount of the underpayment of wages due any workman engaged in the performance of such contract.(f.1) In addition to any other damages permitted by law, when the secretary's determination includes findings that the contractor or subcontractor failed to register or renew registration as required under section 6.1 or failed to certify payroll as required under section 6(b), the department may impose a penalty in the amount of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each separate offense for a violation of the first offense. A second determination by the secretary of the same failure to comply by a contractor or subcontractor within a two-year period, shall subject the contractor or subcontractor to a penalty in the amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000) and to debarment for a duration of two years. The monetary penalty imposed for a violation under this subsection shall be deposited into the Public Work Contractor Compliance Account established in section 6.2(c) to be used exclusively for the purpose of enforcement of contractor and subcontractor public work registration under section 6.1 and building of the certified payroll public database created in section 7.1.(g) It shall not constitute a failure to pay the prevailing wage rates for the work of a particular craft or classification where the prevailing wage rates determined for a specific craft or classification has been paid, and it is asserted that one or more bona fide craft unions contend that the work should have 20250SB0855PN0956 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 been assigned to their members instead of the members of the specific craft to whom it was assigned or by whom it was performed.(h) The following shall constitute substantial evidence of intentional failure to pay prevailing wage rates:(1) Any acts of omission or commission done wilfully or with a knowing disregard of the rights of workmen resulting in the payment of less than prevailing wage rates.(2) After there has been a finding by the secretary in the manner required by this section that any person or firm has failed to pay the prevailing wages prescribed by this act and thereafter there shall be a failure by such person or firm to pay the prevailing wages prescribed by this act, or there shall be a subsequent failure of such person or firm to comply with any opportunity to adjust any differences which shall be afforded him by the secretary.Section 4. This act shall take effect in one year.20250SB0855PN0956 - 16 - 1234567891011121314151617